District of Columbia statutes.
47-1267

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5202(c), 51 DCR 8441

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1263, § 47-1264, § 47-1265, § 47-1266, and § 47-1268.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).